Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.46.020

Scope of chapter—Corrective action measures.

(1) The purpose of this chapter is to provide expeditious methods for the department to exercise proper supervision over the safety and soundness of state trust companies in the interest of Washington state's fiduciary industry and the general public. To that end, this chapter prescribes a series of progressive corrective action measures available to the director, as necessary and in connection with the exercise of his or her examination authority, the ultimate object of which is to restore a state trust company to a state of safe and sound condition and practices and to prevent, if possible, involuntary dissolution of the state trust company under chapter 30B.44B RCW.

(2) In order of progression, these corrective action measures include:

(a) The supervisory directive, which may be issued with the consent of a state trust company as a supervisory agreement or memorandum of understanding or without the state trust company's consent;

(b) The corrective action order, which may be issued with or without the consent of a state trust company; and

(c) The order of conservatorship, which may be issued with or without the consent of a state trust company.

(3) The director may issue and impose upon a state trust company, in lieu of or in addition to his or her authority to issue and serve a notice and statement of charges pursuant to chapter 30B.10 RCW, the following:

(a) A supervisory agreement or memorandum of understanding;

(b) A supervisory directive without the state trust company's consent;

(c) A corrective action order, with or without its consent; and

(d) An order of conservatorship, with or without its consent.

(4) A supervisory agreement or memorandum of understanding, or corrective action order or order of conservatorship consented to by a state trust company, shall not be subject to review except upon a claim by the state trust company or other person with standing under RCW 34.05.530, made in good faith, that the terms and conditions of the supervisory agreement or memorandum of understanding, corrective action order, or order of conservatorship exceed the authority of the director under this title and that consent to the supervisory agreement or memorandum of understanding was unreasonably coerced.

(5) A supervisory directive issued and imposed without the consent of the state trust company shall not be subject to review except by petition for judicial review in the manner provided by the Washington administrative procedure act, RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, inclusive.

(6) A corrective action order or order of conservatorship issued and imposed against a state trust company without its consent shall be deemed an emergency order under RCW 30B.10.180, subject only to judicial review as permitted by RCW 30B.10.180.

(7) No provision in this title shall preclude the director from issuing a corrective action order without having issued a supervisory directive, or issuing an order of conservatorship without having issued a supervisory directive or corrective action order.

(8) No provision in this title shall preclude the director from issuing an order for involuntary dissolution of a state trust company without first having issued corrective action measures if:

(a) Pursuant to RCW 30B.44B.005, the director has determined there is no reasonable likelihood that a state trust company can be restored to a safe and sound condition in the foreseeable future; or

(b) The state trust company gives its consent pursuant to RCW 30B.44B.010.

[ 2019 c 389 s 81.]